Maine, session 132, LD1188.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §275-B, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 51, §1, is further
amended by repealing the 2nd blocked paragraph.
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §275-B, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Facilities approved by commission; track located in another county. The
commission may authorize a facility approved under subsection 3 to continue operation in
the same location as approved under subsection 3 if, notwithstanding subsection 3, the
location where the commercial track is licensed to conduct races is no longer located in the
same county as the facility approved under subsection 3 and the location where the races
are conducted by the commercial track meets the following criteria:
A. The races are conducted at a location within a county contiguous to the county
where the commercial track previously conducted the races;
Page 1 - 132LR1038(03)

B. The races are not located within the same county as a casino licensed under section
1011; and
C. The races are not located within the same municipality as an off-track betting
facility licensed under section 275-D or within a municipality contiguous to a
municipality with an off-track betting facility licensed under section 275-D.
A person licensed pursuant to section 271 to conduct harness horse racing with pari-mutuel
betting that sells pari-mutuel pools and common pari-mutuel pools for simulcast races at a
facility approved under subsection 3 and authorized to continue operation under this
subsection may not receive approval for any additional facilities under the provisions of
subsection 3.
Sec. 3. Provisional approval. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the State Harness Racing Commission may provisionally approve a facility under
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 8, section 275-B, subsection 3 that has made an
application to a municipality for the sale of pari-mutuel pools or common pari-mutuel pools
at that facility, if that application is awaiting a decision from the municipal officers of the
municipality in which the facility is located.
Provisional approval under this section is valid only through December 31, 2025 or
until such time as municipal approval is received or denied, whichever is sooner. A facility
operating under provisional approval shall cease all operations related to this provisional
approval on December 31, 2025 or on the date upon which a municipality denies that
facility's application for the sale of pari-mutuel pools or common pari-mutuel pools at that
facility if the denial occurs prior to December 31, 2025.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1038(03)